Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.020

Misrepresentation—Licensed by department.

A person must not represent himself or herself as a licensed advanced social worker, a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed marriage and family therapist, a licensed social work associate—advanced, a licensed social work associate—independent clinical, a licensed mental health counselor associate, or a licensed marriage and family therapist associate, without being licensed by the department.

[ 2008 c 135 s 12; 2001 c 251 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 135 ss 1, 2, 7-9, and 11-19: See note following RCW 18.19.020.